Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.6504] ADDITIONAL ELECTRONIC MONITORING IN HEALTH CARE FACILITIES. new text end new text begin (a) To address and combat the occurrence of patient abuse in health care facilities, it is necessary to allow electronic monitoring in patient rooms. Studies document the prevalence of abusive acts against patients occurring among vulnerable patients. The vulnerable patient groups include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) elderly patients; new text end new text begin (2) young patients; new text end new text begin (3) neurodivergent patients; new text end new text begin (4) patients with physical or mental disabilities; new text end new text begin (5) pediatric patients; and new text end new text begin (6) patients with impaired cognition. new text end new text begin Patients admitted to health care facilities defined in this paragraph for a continuous period longer than 24 hours may conduct electronic monitoring of their rooms using electronic monitoring devices placed in their rooms as provided in section 144.6502. "Health care facilities" means hospitals licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56, residential hospice facilities licensed under section 144A.753, and birth centers licensed under section 144.615. "Electronic monitoring device" has the meaning given in section 144.6502, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (b) The provisions of electronic monitoring in section 144.6502 apply to this section. new text end